Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.100

Caucus political committee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of representatives.

[ 2024 c 164 s 210.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.